California statutes. Education Code
(b) “Comprehensive sexual health education” means education regarding human development and sexuality, including education on menstrual health, pregnancy, contraception, and sexually transmitted infections.

(c) “English learner” means a pupil as described in subdivision (a) of Section 306.

(d) “HIV prevention education” means instruction on the nature of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and AIDS, methods of transmission, strategies to reduce the risk of HIV infection, and social and public health issues related to HIV and AIDS.

(e) “Instructors trained in the appropriate courses” means instructors with knowledge of the most recent medically accurate research on human sexuality, healthy relationships, pregnancy, and HIV and other sexually transmitted infections.

(f) “Medically accurate” means verified or supported by research conducted in compliance with scientific methods and published in peer-reviewed journals, where appropriate, and recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations and agencies with expertise in the relevant field, such as the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the American Public Health
 Association, the American Academy of Pediatrics, and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.

(g) (1) “School district” includes county boards of education, county superintendents of schools, the California School for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind.

(2) Commencing with the 2019–20 school year, “school district” also includes charter schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   (AB 2229)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51932.

(a) This chapter does not apply to description or illustration of human reproductive organs that may appear in a textbook, adopted pursuant to law, if the textbook does not include other elements of comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education as defined in Section 51931.

(b) This chapter does not apply to instruction, materials, presentations, or programming that discuss gender, gender identity,
 gender expression, sexual orientation, discrimination, harassment, bullying, intimidation, relationships, or family and do not discuss human reproductive organs and their functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 4.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Required Comprehensive Sexual Health Education and HIV Prevention Education [51933. - 51934.]

51933.

All comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education pursuant to Section 51934, whether taught or supplemented by school district personnel or by outside consultants or guest speakers pursuant to Section 51936, shall satisfy all of the following criteria:

(a) Instruction and materials shall be age appropriate.

(b) All factual information presented shall be medically accurate and objective.

(c) All instruction and materials shall align with and support the purposes of this chapter as set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive,
 of subdivision (b) of Section 51930 and may not be in conflict with them.

(d) (1) Instruction and materials shall be appropriate for use with pupils of all races, genders, sexual orientations, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds, pupils with disabilities, and English learners.

(2) Instruction and materials shall be made available on an equal basis to a pupil who is an English learner, consistent with the existing curriculum and alternative options for an English learner pupil as otherwise provided in this code.

(3) Instruction and materials shall be accessible to pupils with disabilities, including, but not limited to, the provision of a modified curriculum, materials and instruction in alternative formats,
 and auxiliary aids.

(4) Instruction and materials shall not reflect or promote bias against any person on the basis of any category protected by Section 220.

(5) Instruction and materials shall affirmatively recognize that people have different sexual orientations and, when discussing or providing examples of relationships and couples, shall be inclusive of same-sex relationships.

(6) Instruction and materials shall teach pupils about gender, gender expression, gender identity, and explore the harm of negative gender stereotypes.

(e) Instruction and materials shall encourage a pupil to communicate with his or her parents, guardians, and other trusted adults
 about human sexuality and provide the knowledge and skills necessary to do so.

(f) Instruction and materials shall teach the value of and prepare pupils to have and maintain committed relationships such as marriage.

(g) Instruction and materials shall provide pupils with knowledge and skills they need to form healthy relationships that are based on mutual respect and affection, and are free from violence, coercion, and intimidation.

(h) Instruction and materials shall provide pupils with knowledge and skills for making and implementing healthy decisions about sexuality, including negotiation and refusal skills to assist pupils in overcoming peer pressure and using effective decisionmaking skills to avoid
 high-risk activities.

(i) Instruction and materials may not teach or promote religious doctrine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 6.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51934.

(a) Each school district shall ensure that all pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, receive comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education from instructors trained in the appropriate courses. Each pupil shall receive this instruction at least once in junior high or middle school and at least once in high school. This instruction shall include all of the following:

(1) Information on the nature of HIV, as well as other sexually transmitted infections, and their effects on the human body.

(2) Information on the manner in which HIV and other sexually transmitted infections are and are not transmitted, including information on the relative risk of infection according to specific
 behaviors, including sexual activities and injection drug use.

(3) Information that abstinence from sexual activity and injection drug use is the only certain way to prevent HIV and other sexually transmitted infections and abstinence from sexual intercourse is the only certain way to prevent unintended pregnancy. This instruction shall provide information about the value of delaying sexual activity while also providing medically accurate information on other methods of preventing HIV and other sexually transmitted infections and pregnancy.

(4) Information about the effectiveness and safety of all federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approved methods that prevent or reduce the risk of contracting HIV and other sexually transmitted infections, including use of antiretroviral medication, consistent with the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(5) Information about the effectiveness and safety of reducing the risk of HIV transmission as a result of injection drug use by decreasing needle use and needle sharing.

(6) Information about the treatment of HIV and other sexually transmitted infections, including how antiretroviral therapy can dramatically prolong the lives of many people living with HIV and reduce the likelihood of transmitting HIV to others.

(7) Discussion about social views on HIV and AIDS, including addressing unfounded stereotypes and myths regarding HIV and AIDS and people living with HIV. This instruction shall emphasize that successfully treated HIV-positive individuals have a normal life expectancy, all people are at some risk of contracting HIV, and the only way to know if one is HIV-positive is to get tested.

(8) Information about local resources, how to access local resources, and pupils’ legal rights to access local resources for sexual and reproductive health care such as testing and medical care for HIV and other sexually transmitted infections and pregnancy prevention and care, as well as local resources for assistance with sexual assault and intimate partner violence.

(9) Information about the effectiveness and safety of all FDA-approved contraceptive methods in preventing pregnancy, including, but not limited to, emergency contraception. Instruction on pregnancy shall include an objective discussion of all legally available pregnancy outcomes, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Parenting, adoption, and abortion.

(B) Information on
 the law on surrendering physical custody of a minor child 72 hours of age or younger, pursuant to Section 1255.7 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 271.5 of the Penal Code.

(C) The importance of prenatal care.

(10) Information about sexual assault, sexual harassment, sexual abuse, and human trafficking. Information on human trafficking shall include both of the following:

(A) Information on the prevalence, nature, and strategies to reduce the risk of human trafficking, techniques to set healthy boundaries, and how to safely seek assistance.

(B) Information on how social media and mobile device applications are used for human trafficking.

(11) Information about adolescent
 relationship abuse and intimate partner violence, including the early warning signs thereof, and information about the resources available to pupils related to adolescent relationship abuse and intimate partner violence, including the National Domestic Violence Hotline and local domestic violence hotlines that provide confidential support services for pupils that have experienced domestic violence or stalking and are available by telephone 24 hours a day.

(b) A school district may provide optional instruction, as part of comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education, regarding the potential risks and consequences of creating and sharing sexually suggestive or sexually explicit materials through cellular telephones, social networking internet websites, computer networks, or other digital media.

(c) A school district may provide comprehensive sexual health
 education or HIV prevention education consisting of age-appropriate instruction earlier than grade 7 using instructors trained in the appropriate courses. A school district that elects to offer comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education earlier than grade 7 may provide age appropriate and medically accurate information on any of the general topics contained in paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.   (AB 2053)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. In-Service Training [51935. - 51936.]

51935.

(a) A school district shall cooperatively plan and conduct in-service training for all school district personnel that provide HIV prevention education, through regional planning, joint powers agreements, or contract services.

(b) In developing and providing in-service training, a school district shall cooperate and collaborate with the teachers of the district who provide HIV prevention education and with the department.

(c) In-service training shall be conducted periodically to enable school district personnel to learn new developments in the scientific understanding of
 HIV. In-service training shall be voluntary for school district personnel who have demonstrated expertise or received in-service training from the department or federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(d) A school district may expand HIV in-service training to cover the topic of comprehensive sexual health education in order for school district personnel who provide comprehensive sexual health education to learn new developments in the scientific understanding of sexual health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 10.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51936.

School districts may contract with outside consultants or guest speakers, including those who have developed multilingual curricula or curricula accessible to persons with disabilities, to deliver comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education or to provide training for school district personnel. All outside consultants and guest speakers shall have expertise in comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education and have knowledge of the most recent medically accurate research on the relevant topic or topics covered in their instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 11.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notice and Parental Excuse [51937. - 51939.]

51937.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage pupils to communicate with their parents or guardians about human sexuality and HIV and to respect the rights of parents or guardians to supervise their children’s education on these subjects. The Legislature intends to create a streamlined process to make it easier for parents and guardians to review materials and evaluation tools related to comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education, and, if they wish, to excuse their children from participation in all or part of that instruction or evaluation. The Legislature recognizes that while parents and guardians overwhelmingly support medically accurate, comprehensive sex education, parents and guardians have the
 ultimate responsibility for imparting values regarding human sexuality to their children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 13.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51938.

(a) A parent or guardian of a pupil has the right to excuse their child from all or part of comprehensive sexual health education, HIV prevention education, and assessments related to that education through a passive consent (“opt-out”) process. A school district shall not require active parental consent (“opt-in”) for comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education.

(b) At the beginning of each school year, or, for a pupil who enrolls in a school after the beginning of the school year, at the time of that pupil’s enrollment, each school district shall notify the parent or guardian of each pupil about instruction in comprehensive
 sexual health education and HIV prevention education and research on pupil health behaviors and risks planned for the coming year. The notice shall do all of the following:

(1) Advise the parent or guardian that written and audiovisual educational materials used in comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education are available for inspection.

(2) Advise the parent or guardian whether the comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education will be taught by school district personnel or by outside consultants. A school district may provide comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education, to be taught by outside consultants, and may hold an assembly to deliver comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education by
 guest speakers, but if it elects to provide comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education in either of these manners, the notice shall include the date of the instruction, the name of the organization or affiliation of each guest speaker, and information stating the right of the parent or guardian to request a copy of this section, Section 51933, and Section 51934. If arrangements for this instruction are made after the beginning of the school year, notice shall be made by mail or another commonly used method of notification, no fewer than 14 days before the instruction is delivered.

(3) Include information explaining the parent’s or guardian’s right to request a copy of this chapter.

(4) Advise the parent or guardian that the parent or guardian has the
 right to excuse their child from comprehensive sexual health education and HIV prevention education and that in order to excuse their child they must state their request in writing to the school district.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 51513, anonymous, voluntary, and confidential research and evaluation tools to measure pupils’ health behaviors and risks, including tests, questionnaires, and surveys containing age-appropriate questions about the pupil’s attitudes concerning or practices relating to sex, may be administered to any pupil in grades 7 to 12, inclusive. A parent or guardian has the right to excuse their child from the test, questionnaire, or survey through a passive consent (“opt-out”) process. A school district shall not require active parental consent (“opt-in”) for these tests, questionnaires, or surveys in grades 7 to 12,
 inclusive. Parents or guardians shall be notified in writing that this test, questionnaire, or survey is to be administered, given the opportunity to review the test, questionnaire, or survey if they wish, notified of their right to excuse their child from the test, questionnaire, or survey, and informed that in order to excuse their child they must state their request in writing to the school district.

(d) The use of outside consultants or guest speakers as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) is within the discretion of the
 school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 14.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51939.

(a) A pupil may not attend any class in comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education, or participate in any anonymous, voluntary, and confidential test, questionnaire, or survey on pupil health behaviors and risks, if the school has received a written request from the pupil’s parent or guardian excusing the pupil from participation.

(b) A pupil may not be subject to disciplinary action, academic
 penalty, or other sanction if the pupil’s parent or guardian declines to permit the pupil to receive comprehensive sexual health education or HIV prevention education or to participate in anonymous, voluntary, and confidential tests, questionnaires, or surveys on pupil health behaviors and risks.

(c) While comprehensive sexual health education, HIV prevention education, or anonymous, voluntary, and confidential test, questionnaire, or survey on pupil health behaviors and risks is being administered, an alternative educational activity shall be made available to pupils whose parents or guardians have requested that they not receive the instruction or participate in the test, questionnaire, or survey.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 398, Sec. 15.   (AB 329)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.7. Prevention of Brain and Spinal Cord Injuries [51940. - 51940.]

51940.

(a) The California Healthy Kids Resource Center, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall review, acquire, and circulate curricula focused on the prevention of brain and spinal cord injuries for use, on a voluntary basis, by school districts maintaining kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The curricula shall contain, at a minimum, age-appropriate components concerning all of the following:

(1) Critical thinking related to learned behavioral patterns, including, but not limited to, strategies and behavioral patterns for avoiding common risk factors or situations.

(2) Acceptance of individual responsibility for avoiding or controlling the risk of injury in activities of daily life, and awareness of the possible consequences of injury, especially the effects of serious brain or spinal cord injuries.

(3) Recognition, avoidance, and management of high-risk situations, such as the following:

(A) Use of automobiles or motorcycles as either a driver or passenger.

(B) Consumption of intoxicating or consciousness-altering substances.

(C) Participation in recreational activities that involve risk of significant physical injury. These activities include skiing, skydiving, hunting, mountain climbing, skateboarding, equestrian events, and other physically challenging pursuits or sports.

(D) Presence as a spectator at events or a witness in circumstances where there is potential for physical injury.

(c) The California Healthy Kids Resource Center shall notify school districts regarding the availability of the curricula.

(d) The review, acquisition, and circulation of curricula pursuant to this section shall be contingent upon the California Healthy Kids Resource Center receiving funds to review, acquire, and circulate the brain and spinal cord injury prevention curricula. All funds necessary to implement this chapter shall be provided by nonstate sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 755, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.8. Sexual Abuse and Sex Trafficking Prevention Education [51950. - 51950.]

51950.

(a) Except as required by subdivision (d), a school district may provide abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking prevention education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking prevention education” means instruction on the prevalence and nature of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking, strategies to reduce risk, techniques to set healthy boundaries, and how to safely seek assistance.

(c) The Superintendent, in consultation with the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services, local educational agencies, and public entity risk pool joint powers authorities that
 provide risk management services to California schools, shall do all of the following:

(1) On or before July 1, 2026, develop, disseminate to all school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools, and post on the department’s internet website, resources and information regarding all of the following:

(A) Building awareness and understanding of appropriate boundaries regarding adult-to-pupil interactions and relationships.

(B) Building awareness and understanding of appropriate professional boundaries between pupils and school personnel and volunteers.

(C) Building awareness and understanding of appropriate pupil-to-pupil interactions and
 relationships.

(D) Building awareness and understanding of the detection and indicators of inappropriate behaviors in adults and pupils, and strategies to reduce risk and establish healthy boundaries.

(E) Options to report child abuse and assault, and inappropriate interactions and relationships, and to safely seek assistance.

(2) On or before July 1, 2026, develop guidance on the appropriate means of instructing pupils regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, of pupils, consistent with all of the following:

(A) The instruction shall be age appropriate and differentiated by grade and instructional setting.

(B) The instruction shall include the prevention of
 abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, of children at home, in the community, on school grounds, by school personnel, other pupils, and school volunteers, or in school-sponsored programs.

(C) The instruction shall be delivered by certificated personnel who do not otherwise have regular contact with the pupils receiving the instruction and who have received training described in subdivision (h).

(d) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools may provide annual instruction, using the resources, information, and guidance developed and disseminated by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (c), to all enrolled pupils.

(e) A parent or guardian of a pupil shall have the right to excuse their child from
 all or part of abuse, including sexual abuse, and human trafficking prevention education, and assessments related to that education, and from the instruction described in subdivision (d), consistent with Section 51938.

(f) The Superintendent may make available on the department’s internet website information about the education described in this section, resources on abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking prevention for professional learning purposes, and relevant materials for parents, guardians, and other caretakers of pupils.

(g) A school district is encouraged to collaborate with its county’s child welfare probation, mental health, public health, and sheriff’s departments, juvenile court, and office of education on intervention programs for pupils and other minors.

(h) As part of
 satisfying the requirements of Section 51934 that education be provided by instructors trained in the appropriate courses, as defined in Section 51931, continuation training shall be available and conducted periodically to enable school district personnel to learn about new developments in the understanding of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking, and to receive instruction on current prevention efforts and methods. A school district is encouraged to include training on early identification of abuse, including sexual abuse, and human trafficking of pupils and other minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 13.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Homework Policies [52000. - 52000.]

52000.

(a) Each local educational agency is encouraged to do all of the following:

(1) (A) By the start of the 2027–28 school year, develop a homework policy for all grades maintained by the local educational agency.

 (B) The goal of the policy is encouraged to be to promote evidence-based homework practices to support pupil learning and well-being, and to ensure consistency and clarity in assigning of homework.

(C) The development of the policy
 is encouraged to involve significant stakeholder participation in order to ensure that the policies are responsive to the unique needs and desires of pupils, parents, and educators in each community, consistent with subdivision (b).

(2) Formally adopt a final homework policy by the start of the 2028–29 school year, consistent with subdivision (c).

(3) Update the adopted homework policy at least once every five years, consistent with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) In developing and updating the homework policy, the governing board or body of the local educational agency
 is encouraged to convene stakeholders, including, but not limited to, pupils, parents, teachers and education specialists, administrators, and other school staff, to do all of the following:

(1) Examine and collect data on the current homework practices of schools in the local educational agency, including the nature of assignments and the time required at each grade level.

(2) Reflect on the effectiveness of these practices and identify strengths and weaknesses of current practices.

(3) Solicit stakeholder feedback.

(c) The
 local educational agency’s homework policy adoption, and any updates to the local educational agency’s homework policy, are encouraged to be publicly discussed, with public comment, and considered for adoption at a minimum of two separate regularly scheduled public meetings conducted pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(d) In developing and updating the homework policy, the governing board or body of the local educational agency is encouraged to consider all of the following:

(1) Research on effective homework practices, including the quality of assignments and quantity of work assigned, which support pupil learning and well-being, including, but not limited to, mental and physical health.

(2) Elements of a homework policy that ensure the use of effective homework practices to support pupil learning and well-being, including the quality of assignments, quantity of work assigned at
 each grade level, and days on which homework is assigned.

(3) Equity in homework practices, including, but not limited to, the availability of supports needed to successfully complete homework, such as parental support and access to technology.

(4) Different types of homework, including for practice, completion of in-class work, preparation, and extension.

(5) Different educational placements and programs in which pupils are enrolled, including, but not limited to, independent study, honors courses, Advanced Placement courses, International Baccalaureate courses, dual enrollment courses, accelerated pathways, music programs, credit recovery programs, continuation schools, block scheduling, and project-based learning.

(6) Individual pupil needs,
 including, but not limited to, pupils with individualized education programs adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), pupils with a plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), and English learners.

(7) Developmental appropriateness of homework assigned in primary, intermediate, and secondary grades.

(8) Grading practices for homework, including whether homework should be optional and whether it should be graded, and opportunities to complete makeup work for missed assignments.

(9) The need for professional development and collaboration time for teachers to coordinate and implement effective homework practices.

(10) The roles and
 responsibilities of all pupils, parents, teachers, and administrators in implementing the homework policy.

(e) Local educational agencies are encouraged to annually distribute the adopted or updated homework policy at the beginning of the school year to all certificated staff and administrators, to all pupils and parents or legal guardians as part of the notification pursuant to Section 48980 or upon enrollment, and by publication on the local educational agency’s internet website and on the internet websites of the individual schools operated by the local educational agency.

(f) (1) The department may develop and post on its internet website guidelines for local educational agencies to use in developing a local homework policy, as described in subdivision (a), including the processes described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (e), and the considerations listed in subdivision (d).

(2) The department is encouraged to develop and post the guidelines by January 1, 2026.

(g) A local educational agency that has formally adopted a homework policy on or before July 31, 2024, is encouraged to update its adopted homework policy before the start of the 2028–29 school year or within five years of its adoption, whichever is later, and the local educational agency’s updated homework policy
 is encouraged to be consistent with this section.

(h) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 751, Sec. 3.   (AB 2999)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.1. Public Schools Accountability Act of 1999 [52050. - 52077.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Intent [52050. - 52050.5.]

52050.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Public Schools Accountability Act of 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   Effective June 25, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

52050.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The purpose of the California public school system is to provide for the academic development of each pupil and prepare each pupil, to the extent of his or her ability, to become a lifelong learner, equipped to live and succeed within the economic and societal complexities of the 21st century.

(b) It is in the interest of the people and the future of this state to ensure that each child in California receives a high quality education consistent with all statewide content and performance standards, as adopted by the State Board of Education, and with a meaningful assessment system and reporting program requirements.

(c) Recent assessments indicate that many pupils in California are not now, generally, progressing at a satisfactory rate to achieve a high quality education.

(d) To remedy this, the state is in need of an immediate and comprehensive accountability system to hold each of the state’s public schools accountable for the academic progress and achievement of its pupils within the resources available to schools.

(e) Any promising and effective accountability system must be based upon a constructive and collaborative process that seeks to include stakeholders in the accountability process.

(f) Any promising and effective accountability system requires the active involvement of parents and guardians, pupils, educators, community leaders, school boards, and schoolsite teams.

(g) The statewide school accountability system must encourage the active participation of parents and guardians, pupils, educators, and the local community in improving pupil achievement.

(h) The statewide accountability system must be easily accessible and understandable to parents and others.

(i) The statewide accountability system must include rewards that recognize high achieving schools as well as interventions and, ultimately, sanctions for schools that are continuously low performing.

(j) It is also the intent of the Legislature that the comprehensive and effective school accountability system primarily focus on increasing academic achievement.

(k) To achieve better pupil performance, it is the intent of the Legislature that any school accountability system do all of the following:

(1) Encourage teacher preparation that allows teachers to develop the ability to inspire pupils to become lifelong learners.

(2) Encourage teacher preparation and consistent ongoing professional development that serves to develop competency in content and pedagogy and that allows teachers to effectively involve themselves in promoting school accountability.

(3) Encourage the involvement of the community and its stakeholders in the accountability system.

(4) Encourage local community involvement in providing support for education and identifying causes of pupil failure and designing programs for remediation.

(5) Approach accountability with an attitude of collaboration, encouragement, and correction.

(6) Utilize the state infrastructure to support schools, school districts, and county offices of education in their efforts to improve pupil achievement and progress.

(7) Encourage each local community to support and sustain high-quality educational programs and to build the capacity of educators and schools to succeed in educating every pupil.

(8) Encourage active involvement of parents and guardians in the development and implementation of school accountability systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   Effective June 25, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Public School Performance Accountability Program [52052. - 52052.]

52052.

(a) (1) The single multiple measures public school accountability system authorized by Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) shall measure the overall performance of numerically significant pupil subgroups in schools, including charter schools, school districts, and county offices of education.

(2) For purposes of this section, numerically significant pupil subgroups include all of the following:

(A) Ethnic subgroups.

(B) Socioeconomically disadvantaged pupils.

(C) English
 learners and, separately, long-term English learners, defined as a pupil who has not attained English language proficiency within seven years of initial classification as an English learner.

(D) Pupils with disabilities.

(E) Foster youth.

(F) Homeless youth.

(3) (A) For purposes of this section, a numerically significant pupil subgroup is one that consists of at least 30 pupils.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a subgroup of pupils who are foster youth, homeless youth, or long-term English learners, a numerically significant pupil subgroup is one that consists
 of at least 15 pupils.

(b) To complement the multiple measures system, the Superintendent, with the approval of the state board, may develop and implement a program of school quality review that features locally convened panels to visit schools, observe teachers, interview pupils, and examine pupil work.

(c) The Superintendent shall annually provide to local educational agencies and the public a transparent and understandable explanation of the individual components of the multiple measures system.

(d) For purposes of the statewide system of support established pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5), or any successor system, alternative schools include schools under the jurisdiction of a county
 board of education or a county superintendent of schools, community day schools, nonpublic, nonsectarian schools pursuant to Section 56366, and alternative schools serving high-risk pupils, including continuation high schools, dropout recovery high schools, and opportunity schools.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Dropout recovery high school” means a school offering instruction in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, in which 50 percent or more of its pupils are either designated as dropouts pursuant to the exit and withdrawal codes developed by the department or left a school and were not otherwise enrolled in a school for a period of at least 180 days and the school provides instruction in partnership with any of the
 following:

(A) The federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(B) Federally affiliated Youthbuild programs (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3226 et seq.).

(C) Federal job corps training or instruction provided pursuant to a memorandum of understanding with the federal provider.

(D) The California Conservation Corps or local conservation corps certified by the California Conservation Corps pursuant to Section 14406 or 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) “Homeless youth” has the same meaning as in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(f) For any program identified in law that utilized a calculation pursuant to the former Academic Performance Index established pursuant to this section, as this section read on January 1, 2018, the 2013 growth calculation shall be applied for those purposes. For purposes of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 47607, alternative measures that show increases in pupil academic achievement for all groups of pupils schoolwide and among numerically significant pupil subgroups shall be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 194, Sec. 18.   (SB 141)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Quality Education Investment Act of 2006 [52055.700. - 52055.780.]

52055.700.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Quality Education Investment Act of 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 751, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52055.710.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to accomplish all of the following:
